District of Columbia statutes.
47-2818

Mattress manufacture, renovation, storage, or sale; “mattress” defined.

(a)

(1)

Persons engaged in the business of manufacturing or renovating mattresses shall pay a license fee of $476 biennially.

(2)

Any license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be issued as a Manufacturing endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

(b)

(1)

Owners or managers of establishments where mattresses are stored, sold, or kept for sale shall pay a license fee of $34 biennially.

(2)

Any license issued pursuant to this subsection shall be issued as a General Sales endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

(c)

Within the meaning of this section, the term “mattress” shall be deemed to include any quilt, comforter, pad, pillow, cushion, or bag stuffed with hair, down, feathers, wool, cotton, excelsior, jute, or any other soft material and designed for use for sleeping or reclining purposes.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 625, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 18
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 553, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(j), 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 302(c), 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(15), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(G), 50 DCR 6913

Cross References

Mattresses, manufacture, renovation and sale, see § 8-501 et seq.
Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2818.
1973 Ed., § 47-2318.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (a)(2), substituted “Manufacturing endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Manufacturing endorsement to a master business license under the master”; and in subsec. (b)(2), substituted “General Sales endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class B General Sales endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(G) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).